Maryland, session 2025, SB0870.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–512.
During the open season for migratory waterfowl, a person may not fish by any means
within 500 yards of any stationary blind or blind site which is occupied and is being used
for hunting migratory waterfowl.
8–701.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0870*

SENATE BILL 870
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(s) (1) “Vessel” means every description of watercraft, including an ice boat
but not including a seaplane, that is used or capable of being used as a means of
transportation on water or ice.
(2) “Vessel” includes the motor, spars, sails, and accessories of a vessel.
8–724.2.
DURING THE OPEN SEASON FOR MIGRATORY WATERFOWL, A PERSON MAY NOT
OPERATE A VESSEL, INCLUDING A KAYAK OR A PADDLE BOAT, IN ANY MANNER
WITHIN 500 YARDS OF ANY STATIONARY BLIND OR BLIND SITE THAT IS OCCUPIED
AND BEING USED FOR HUNTING MIGRATORY WATERFOWL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.